Utah statutes.
59-10-205.   Tax on nonresident estate or trust.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a tax is imposed on a nonresident estate or trust in an amount equal to the product of:

(a)  the nonresident estate's or trust's state taxable income as determined under Section 59-10-204; and

(b)  the percentage listed in Subsection 59-10-104(2).

(2)  The following are not subject to a tax imposed by this part:

(a)  a nonresident estate or trust that is not required to file a federal income tax return for estates and trusts for the taxable year; or

(b)  a nonresident trust taxed as a corporation.

